New Jersey, session 221, S1549.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A board of education or a contractor that provides pupil transportation services under contract with a board of education shall ensure that a school bus has on board at least one school bus aide for every 15 students with special needs.  The aide-to-student ratio shall be maintained at all times when a school bus is transporting students with special needs or a combination of students with special needs and general education students. b.    As used in this section, student with special needs means a student who is classified as eligible for special education programs and services, but shall not include a student who is classified as eligible for special education programs and services solely on the basis of a specific learning disability, as the term is defined in the federal "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act," 20 U.S.C. s.1400 et seq. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year following the date of enactment.